Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-320 Special consent investments.
Upon approval of the commissioner and in compliance with section 431:6-104, an
insurer may make any investment or kind of investment or exchange of assets
otherwise prohibited or not eligible under this article. The commissioner's
order of approval, if granted, shall specify whether any part of the investment
may be credited to required minimum capital or surplus investment, or to
investment of reserves. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next